Missouri, session 2026, HB2765.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 312, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto ten new sections, to be
known as sections 312.1000, 312.1005, 312.1010, 312.1015, 312.1020, 312.1025, 312.1030,
312.1035, 312.1037, and 312.1040, to read as follows:
312.1000. As used in sections 312.1000 to 312.1040, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificially derived cannabinoid", a cannabinoid extracted from a hemp
plant, or hemp plant parts with a chemical makeup that is changed after extraction to
create a different cannabinoid or other chemical compound by applying a catalyst other
than heat or light. Artificially derived cannabinoid includes, but is not limited to, any
tetrahydrocannabinol created from cannabidiol;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Division", the division of alcohol and tobacco control;
(4) "Hemp beverage" or "hemp beverage product", a beverage intended for
human consumption that does not include cannabis flower or cannabis concentrate;
and:
(a) Contains or consists of hemp plant parts; or
(b) Contains hemp concentrate or artificially derived cannabinoids in
combination with other ingredients;
(5) "Hemp business", one of the following licensed under sections 312.1000 to
312.1040:
(a) Hemp beverage manufacturer;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2765 2
(b) Hemp beverage wholesaler; or
(c) Hemp beverage retailer.

"Hemp business" does not include a person or entity licensed to grow industrial hemp
for commercial or research purposes or to process industrial hemp for commercial
purposes;
(6) "Hemp concentrate":
(a) The extracts and resins of a hemp plant or hemp plant parts;
(b) The extracts or resins of a hemp plant or hemp plant parts that are refined to
increase the presence of targeted cannabinoids; or
(c) A product that is produced by refining extracts or resins of a hemp plant or
hemp plant parts and is intended to be consumed by combustion or vaporization of the
product and inhalation of smoke, aerosol, or vapor from the product.

"Hemp concentrate" does not include artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp
beverages, hemp-derived consumer products, or hemp-derived topical products;
(7) "Hemp plant", all parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis that is growing or
has not been harvested and has a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no
more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis;
(8) "Hemp plant parts", any part of the harvested hemp plant, including the
flower, bud, leaves, stems, and stalk, but does not include derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers that are separated from the
plant. "Hemp plant parts" do not include hemp fiber products, hemp grain, or hemp
seed;
(9) "Hemp seed", the viable seed of the plant of the genus Cannabis that is
intended to be planted and is reasonably expected to grow into a hemp plant. "Hemp
seed" does not include cannabis seed or hemp grain;
(10) "Industrial hemp", the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of the plant,
whether growing or not, including the plant's seeds, and all the plant's derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than three-tenths of
one percent on a dry weight basis. Industrial hemp is not marijuana, as defined under
article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri;
(11) "Unfinished hemp extract", an oil, extract, concentrate, or other substance
that has a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration above three-tenths of one percent
on a dry weight basis, is not for consumer use or retail distribution, and is intended to
undergo further refinement or processing into a hemp product.

HCS HB 2765 3
312.1005. 1. The division shall issue the following types of hemp business
licenses:
(1) Hemp beverage manufacturer;
(2) Hemp beverage wholesaler; and
(3) Hemp beverage retailer.
2. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 or chapter
311 to the contrary, there shall be no interpretations that prohibit liquor licensees from
manufacturing, distributing, or selling hemp beverage products that comply with the
provisions of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 and any other rules adopted by the division.
3. A person, cooperative, or business may hold both a hemp beverage
manufacturer and hemp beverage retailer license but may only operate hemp beverage
retail operations on site at the premises in which the hemp beverage product is
manufactured.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person, cooperative, or
business holding any one of the three types of hemp beverage licenses shall hold either of
the other two types of hemp beverage licenses and shall not have a financial interest,
either direct or indirect, in a person, cooperative, or business holding any of the other
two types of hemp beverage licenses.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no hemp beverage manufacturer
shall sell or otherwise convey hemp beverage products to retailers. Hemp beverage
manufacturers are authorized to solicit and sell hemp beverage products to hemp
beverage wholesalers. Hemp beverage wholesalers are authorized to solicit and sell
hemp beverage products to hemp beverage retailers.
6. A person, cooperative, or business holding a hemp beverage manufacturer
license, a hemp beverage wholesaler license, or a hemp beverage retailer license, or any
combination of the three, shall not hold a marijuana facility license or a medical facility
license, as such terms are defined in article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri.
7. No license shall be issued to a hemp beverage retailer unless the hemp
beverage retailer also has an active license issued by the division allowing it to sell
alcoholic beverages. This restriction shall not apply to hemp beverage manufacturers or
hemp beverage wholesalers, unless they are seeking a hemp beverage retailer license.
8. No hemp beverage wholesaler or hemp beverage retailer shall distribute or
sell any hemp beverage products that the wholesaler or retailer knows or reasonably
should know were manufactured outside of the United States.
9. Unfinished hemp extract may only be imported by a hemp beverage
manufacturer if:

HCS HB 2765 4
(1) The unfinished hemp extract is derived from industrial hemp biomass that
has been cultivated under a state-sponsored industrial hemp program or the U.S.
Department of Agriculture; and
(2) The hemp beverage manufacturer has records to substantiate the source of
the hemp biomass.
10. Unfinished hemp extract may only be exported by a hemp beverage
manufacturer if:
(1) The hemp beverage manufacturer does not export unfinished hemp extract
to a state where unfinished hemp extract is prohibited by state law; and
(2) The hemp beverage manufacturer does not sell or export unfinished hemp
extract to any person or entity that does not hold a valid hemp beverage manufacturer
license.
312.1010. 1. The division, by rule, shall establish forms and procedures for the
processing of hemp licenses issued under sections 312.1000 to 312.1040. At a minimum,
any application to obtain or renew a hemp business license shall include the following
information, if applicable:
(1) The name, address, and date of birth of the applicant;
(2) The address and legal property description of the business;
(3) Proof of business name registration;
(4) Certification that the applicant shall comply with the requirements of
sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 relating to the ownership and operation of a hemp
business;
(5) Identification of one or more controlling persons or managerial employees as
agents who shall be responsible for dealing with the division on all matters; and
(6) A statement that the applicant agrees to respond to the division's
supplemental requests for information.
2. An application on behalf of a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or association shall be signed by at least two officers or managing agents of
that entity.
3. The division may issue a hemp business license to an applicant who:
(1) Is or is owned and managed by persons at least twenty-one years of age who
has or have not been convicted of a felony related to controlled substances within the
previous ten years in any state or federal jurisdiction and who is or are current in filing
all applicable tax returns to the department of revenue and in payment of all taxes,
interest, and penalties assessed by the department of revenue;

HCS HB 2765 5
(2) Has completed an application for licensure or application for renewal and
has fully and truthfully complied with all information requests relating to license
application and renewal;
(3) Has paid the applicable application and license fees. For hemp beverage
manufacturers, the license fee shall be one thousand dollars. For hemp beverage
wholesalers, the license fee shall be five hundred dollars. For hemp beverage retailers,
the license fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars per location;
(4) Is not employed by the division, department, or any other state agency with
regulatory authority over sections 312.1000 to 312.1040; and
(5) Does not hold any marijuana facility or medical facility license, as such terms
are defined in article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri.
4. Licenses shall be renewed annually, and the renewal fee shall be in the same
amount as the fee required for the initial application.
5. Licenses shall not be transferred.
6. The division shall promulgate such regulations related to hemp business
licensees for the administration of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 and shall design all
necessary forms. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
7. Whenever it shall be determined that a hemp business licensee has violated
any of the provisions of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040, the supervisor of the division may
warn, place on probation on such terms and conditions as the supervisor deems
appropriate for a period not to exceed twelve months, fine in an amount not to exceed
five thousand dollars per violation, suspend for a period not to exceed twelve months, or
revoke the license of the licensee. The licensee shall have thirty days' notice of the
imposition of discipline and may seek a determination thereon by the administrative
hearing commission pursuant to the provisions of section 621.045.
8. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Hemp-Derived Products
Fund", which shall consist of all fees authorized to be charged by the division under this
section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a

HCS HB 2765 6
dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used solely by the division for the
purposes of administration of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
312.1015. 1. A hemp beverage manufacturer license entitles the license holder
to:
(1) Purchase hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, and artificially derived
cannabinoids from industrial hemp processors and hemp beverage manufacturers;
(2) Purchase hemp plant parts and propagules from industrial hemp growers;
(3) Purchase hemp concentrate;
(4) Manufacture hemp beverages for public consumption;
(5) Package and label hemp beverages for sale to customers;
(6) Sell hemp concentrate to other hemp businesses;
(7) Sell hemp beverage products to hemp beverage wholesalers; and
(8) Perform any other actions approved by the department and division.
2. All hemp beverage manufacturing shall take place in a Current Good
Manufacturing Practices-certified facility or in a facility licensed as a brewery, distiller,
or winery.
3. A hemp beverage manufacturer shall comply with all applicable packaging,
labeling, and testing requirements established by the department. Labels and
packaging for the hemp beverage products shall not consist of images or designs that
are intended to be attractive to individuals under twenty-one years of age. A product
shall be considered attractive under this subsection if it uses labeling, packaging,
advertising, and marketing that is especially appealing to children, including, but not
limited to, the use of:
(1) Cartoons, meaning any drawing or other depiction of an object, person,
animal, creature, or any similar caricature that satisfies any of the following criteria:
(a) The use of comically exaggerated features;
(b) The attribution of human characteristics to animals, plants, or other objects;
or
(c) The attribution of unnatural or extra-human abilities; and
(2) Similarities to products that are commonly used by or marketed to
individuals under twenty-one, including but not limited to, candy, soda, drinks, cookies,

HCS HB 2765 7
or cereal, except when used to describe the contents, taste, or ingredients of the product
sold.
4. All hemp beverage products shall be registered by the manufacturer with the
department prior to sale. The department may establish reasonable fees for the
registration of each hemp beverage product.
5. Upon the sale of any hemp beverage, a hemp beverage manufacturer shall
provide a statement to the buyer that discloses the product's ingredients, including, but
not limited to, any chemicals or compounds and any major food allergens declared by
name.
6. A hemp beverage manufacturer shall not add any artificially derived
cannabinoid, hemp plant part, or hemp concentrate to a product if the manufacturer of
the product holds a trademark to the product's name, except that a hemp beverage
manufacturer may use a trademarked food product if the manufacturer uses the
product as a component or as part of a recipe and if the hemp beverage manufacturer
does not state or advertise to the customer that the final retail hemp beverage product
contains a trademarked food product.
7. A hemp beverage manufacturer shall not add any cannabis flower, cannabis
concentrate, or cannabinoid derived from cannabis flower or cannabis concentrate to a
product.
8. The hemp beverage manufacturer shall have a hemp beverage product tested
prior to distribution to confirm compliance with all statutory and regulatory
requirements. The testing shall be performed by a laboratory holding an ISO 17025
accreditation or that is registered with the Drug Enforcement Administration in
accordance with 21 CFR 1301.13, and which does not have a direct or indirect interest
in the entity whose product is being tested.
9. No hemp beverage manufacturer who designates a specific geographic area
for which a hemp beverage wholesaler shall be responsible shall enter into any
agreement with any other person for the purpose of establishing an additional
wholesaler for the same brands of hemp beverage products in such designated area.
10. Any hemp beverage manufacturer or wholesaler who violates the provisions
of this section, or permits its employees, officers, or agents to do so, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished only as follows:
(1) For the first offense, by a fine of one thousand dollars;
(2) For the second offense, by a fine of five thousand dollars; and
(3) For the third or any subsequent offense, by a fine of twenty-five thousand
dollars.

HCS HB 2765 8
312.1020. 1. A hemp beverage wholesaler may transport hemp beverages on
public roadways provided the hemp beverages are in a safe and secured storage
compartment that is part of the motor vehicle.
2. A hemp beverage wholesaler may sell to retailers hemp beverage products
that:
(1) Are obtained from a licensed hemp beverage manufacturer;
(2) Meet all applicable packaging and labeling requirements established by the
department; and
(3) Comply with any other rules adopted by the department.
3. Any vehicle assigned for the purposes of hemp beverage delivery is subject to
inspection by the division at any time.
4. Any hemp beverage products stored by a hemp beverage wholesaler shall be
stored in a secure climate-controlled location that is locked and inaccessible to the
general public.
312.1025. 1. A hemp beverage retailer shall only sell hemp beverages to
individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age. No person under twenty-one years
of age shall sell or assist in the sale or dispensing of the hemp beverages.
2. A hemp beverage retailer shall not sell any product the retailer knows, or has
reason to know, contains more than three-tenths of one percent of tetrahydrocannabinol
content.
3. A hemp beverage retailer may sell hemp beverage products that:
(1) Are obtained from a licensed Missouri hemp beverage wholesaler or is
manufactured by the hemp beverage retailer as a licensed hemp beverage manufacturer
on the premises it is sold; and
(2) Meet all applicable packaging and labeling requirements established by the
department.
4. A hemp beverage retailer or its agent may deliver hemp beverages to
consumers. The division may promulgate rules regarding the delivery of hemp
beverages so long as such rules are no stricter than the rules governing the delivery of
alcohol by a retailer or its agent. If a hemp beverage retailer chooses to deliver hemp
beverages to consumers, it shall submit an application to the supervisor and pay an
annual permit fee of no more than one hundred dollars, which shall be determined by
the division.
5. A hemp beverage retailer may sell other products or items for which the hemp
beverage retailer has a license or authorization or that do not require a license or
authorization.

HCS HB 2765 9
6. It shall constitute a class B misdemeanor for a hemp beverage retailer or any
other person to sell or provide hemp beverage products to a person under twenty-one
years of age. It shall constitute a class B misdemeanor for a person under twenty-one
years of age to knowingly acquire, possess, or consume a hemp beverage product.
Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section to the contrary, law enforcement
agency efforts utilizing a person under twenty-one years of age but at least eighteen
years of age, wherein the person does not consume the hemp beverage product, are not
precluded. The division may enforce compliance with this section by conducting
random, unannounced inspections at locations where such products are sold or
distributed to ensure compliance with sections 312.1000 to 312.1040. The division shall
submit an annual publicly accessible report to the general assembly describing in detail
the division's enforcement efforts.
7. A hemp beverage retailer shall ensure that all hemp beverages offered for sale
comply with the limits on the amount and types of cannabinoids that a hemp beverage
product can contain, including, but not limited to, the requirement that hemp beverages
are either multi-serving or a single serving hemp beverage and:
(1) A multi-serving hemp beverage shall be bottled or placed in a container of no
less than three hundred seventy-five milliliters and no more than one and three-quarters
liters; be bottled or placed in a resealable container that uses a screw top or cork-style
cap; with container servings measured in no less than one and a half ounces; and no
more than ten milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per serving;
(2) A single serving hemp-derived cannabinoid shall be bottled, canned, or
placed in a container of no less than fifty milliliters and no more than nineteen and two-
tenths ounces; be canned or placed in a container that utilizes a traditional pull tab;
have no more than ten milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per container and contain no
more than one serving per container. A single serving hemp beverage product may be
sold in pack of twenty-four; and
(3) Consist of servings that contain no more than ten milligrams of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol.
8. A hemp beverage retailer shall not:
(1) Sell a hemp beverage to a person who is visibly intoxicated;
(2) Sell cannabis flower or cannabis products; or
(3) Allow for the dispensing of hemp beverage products in vending machines.
9. A hemp beverage retailer may permit onsite consumption of hemp beverage
products which contain no more than five milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per
serving that are consumed by consumers onsite.

HCS HB 2765 10
10. A hemp beverage retailer shall ensure that hemp beverage products sold for
onsite consumption comply with sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 and rules adopted
pursuant to sections 312.1000 to 312.1040 regarding testing.
11. Food and beverages not otherwise prohibited by this section may be
prepared and sold onsite provided that the hemp beverage retailer complies with all
relevant state and local laws, ordinances, licensing requirements, and zoning
requirements.
12. A hemp beverage retailer selling products onsite shall not:
(1) Sell hemp beverage products to a customer who the hemp beverage retailer
knows or reasonably should know is intoxicated, either from consumption of alcohol,
other hemp beverages, or any other drug;
(2) Sell hemp beverage products that are designed or reasonably expected to be
mixed with an alcoholic beverage; or
(3) Permit hemp beverage products that have been removed from the products'
packaging to be removed from the premises of the hemp beverage retailer.
13. A hemp beverage retailer shall maintain compliance with state and local
building, fire, and zoning codes, requirements, or regulations.
14. A hemp beverage retailer shall ensure that the licensed premises is
maintained in a clean and sanitary condition, free from infestation by insects, rodents,
or other pests.
15. No hemp beverage manufacturer or wholesaler may pay to a hemp beverage
retailer, nor shall any hemp beverage retailer accept, any payment, credit, or any other
consideration to induce the hemp beverage retailer to advertise or display a hemp
beverage product in a certain manner on the hemp beverage retailer's licensed
premises. Further, no hemp beverage manufacturer or wholesaler may pay to a hemp
beverage retailer any fee rental or other consideration for the use of any part of the
licensed retail premises for advertising any brand name for the purpose of advertising
the same.
16. A hemp beverage retailer is subject to inspection by the division at any time.
17. The division shall not issue a hemp beverage license to any retail
establishment located within one hundred feet of any educational institution providing
education to children at any level between preschool and twelfth grade, or the
equivalent, nor to any retail establishment located within one hundred feet of any
church or place of worship. The prohibition in this subsection shall not apply to
businesses selling hemp-derived cannabinoids prior to December 31, 2026.
312.1030. 1. As used in this section, "franchise" means a written or oral
arrangement for a definite or indefinite period in which a person grants to another

HCS HB 2765 11
person a license to use a trade name, trademark, service mark, or related characteristic,
and in which there is a community of interest in the marketing of goods or services at
wholesale, retail, by lease, agreement, or otherwise, including, but not limited to, a
commercial relationship of definite duration or continuing indefinite duration, between
a hemp beverage wholesaler, to hemp beverage retailers, duly licensed in this state, and
a hemp beverage manufacturer, and wherein a hemp beverage wholesaler is granted the
right to offer, sell, and distribute within this state or any designated area thereof some or
all of the hemp beverage manufacturer's hemp beverage products to hemp beverage
retailers.
2. If more than one franchise for the same brand or brands of hemp beverage
products is granted to different hemp beverage wholesalers in Missouri, it is a violation
for any hemp beverage manufacturers to discriminate between the wholesalers with
respect to any of the terms, provisions, and conditions of these franchises.
3. Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, and conditions of any franchise, no
hemp beverage manufacturer shall unilaterally terminate or refuse to continue or
change substantially the condition of any franchise with the hemp beverage wholesaler
unless the manufacturer has first established good cause for such termination,
noncontinuance, or change.
4. Any hemp beverage wholesaler may bring an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction against a hemp beverage manufacturer for violation of any of the provisions
of this section and may recover damages sustained by such wholesaler together with the
costs of the action and reasonable attorney's fees.
5. In any action brought by a hemp beverage wholesaler against a hemp
beverage manufacturer for termination, noncontinuance, or substantial change in
violation of the provisions of this section, it is a complete defense for the hemp beverage
manufacturer to prove that the termination, noncontinuance, or change was done in
good faith and for good cause.
6. As used in this section, "good faith" is the duty of each party to any franchise
and all officers, employees, or agents thereof to act in a fair and equitable manner
towards each other, and "good cause" means the following:
(1) Failure by the hemp beverage wholesaler to comply substantially with the
provisions of an agreement or understanding with the hemp beverage manufacturer,
which provisions are both essential and reasonable;
(2) Use of bad faith or failure to observe reasonable commercial standards of
fair dealing in the trade; or
(3) Revocation or suspension for more than thirty days of the hemp beverage
wholesaler's state or local license required for normal operations of its business.

HCS HB 2765 12
312.1035. 1. A hemp beverage product that is sold in this state shall be labeled
with consumer protection warnings in the form of statements that cover all of the
following:
(1) A list of ingredients and possible allergens and a nutritional fact panel or
have a code that can be scanned that directs consumers to a website containing the list of
ingredients and possible allergens and a nutritional fact panel;
(2) A statement that use while pregnant or breastfeeding may be harmful;
(3) A statement that consumption of certain cannabinoids may impair your
ability to drive and operate heavy machinery;
(4) A statement that the product is not approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration;
(5) A statement to keep out of reach of children;
(6) A statement to consult your physician before use;
(7) The amount of hemp-derived cannabinoid in each serving of the product,
measured in milligrams;
(8) The total amount of hemp-derived cannabinoid in the entire package,
measured in milligrams;
(9) The net weight of the product; and
(10) An expiration date in accordance with applicable federal or state law.
2. A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer of a hemp beverage product shall not
advertise, market, or offer for sale the product by using, in the labeling or design of the
product or product packaging or in advertising or marketing materials for the product
trade dress, trademarks, branding, or other related materials, any imagery or scenery
that depicts or signifies characters or symbols known to appeal primarily to persons
under twenty-one years of age, including, but not limited to, superheroes, comic book
characters, video game characters, television show characters, movie characters, and
mythical creatures.
312.1037. The division shall allow retailers and wholesalers one hundred and
twenty days after August 28, 2026, to sell any adult hemp beverage products that were
in the retailer's or wholesalers' inventory as of August 28, 2026. All sales shall be in
compliance with the provisions of sections 312.1000 to 312.1040, including the
prohibition on sales to persons under twenty-one years of age. On and after one
hundred and twenty days after August 28, 2026, all hemp beverage products that have
not been removed from the inventory of a retailer or wholesaler shall be subject to
forfeiture and destruction and shall not be purchased or sold in this state. The cost of
seizure, forfeiture, and destruction or disposal under this section shall be paid by the
person or entity from whom the adult hemp beverage products are confiscated.

HCS HB 2765 13
312.1040. 1. An excise tax at the rate of seven percent is imposed on the retail
sale of a hemp beverage product. The tax is in addition to any tax imposed under any
other provision of federal, state, or local law.
2. The tax imposed by this section is intended to be passed on to and borne by
the purchaser of the hemp-derived consumable product. The tax is a debt from the
purchaser to the retailer until paid. A retailer is considered to act as a trustee on behalf
of the state when it collects tax from the purchaser on a taxable transaction. The tax
shall be stated and charged separately on any documentation provided to the purchaser
by the retailer at the time of the transaction.
✔